src/scripts/Tatar/g2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2017, 2018  Olga Yakovleva <yakovleva.o.v@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

read spaced-text dict-prefixes.txt
define PrefixDict0
clear

read spaced-text dict-words.txt
define WordDict0
clear

define RussianVTranscription в -> v ; 

define PrefixDict PrefixDict0 .o. RussianVTranscription ; 
define WordDict WordDict0 .o. RussianVTranscription ; 

define TatarVowelLetter а|ә|е|ё|и|о|ө|у|ү|ы|э|ю|я|і ; 
define TatarConsonantLetter б|в|г|д|ж|җ|з|й|к|л|м|н|ң|п|р|с|т|ф|х|һ|ц|ч|ш|щ|ğ|q|w|қ|ғ ; 
define TatarLetter TatarVowelLetter | TatarConsonantLetter | ь | ъ ; 

define Prefix0 PrefixDict.u ; 
define Prefix(x) [x .o. [x [TatarLetter+]:0]].l ; 
define Prefix1 Prefix(Prefix0) ; 
define UnambigPrefix1 Prefix0 - Prefix1 ; 
define PrefixRule1 [UnambigPrefix1 .o. PrefixDict] TatarLetter* ; 
define Prefix2 Prefix(Prefix1) ; 
define UnambigPrefix2 Prefix1 - Prefix2 ; 
define PrefixRule2 [UnambigPrefix2 .o. PrefixDict] TatarLetter* ; 
define Prefix3 Prefix(Prefix2) ; 
define UnambigPrefix3 Prefix2 - Prefix3 ; 
define PrefixRule3 [UnambigPrefix3 .o. PrefixDict] TatarLetter* ; 
define Prefix4 Prefix(Prefix3) ; 
define UnambigPrefix4 Prefix3 - Prefix4 ; 
define PrefixRule4 [UnambigPrefix4 .o. PrefixDict] TatarLetter* ; 
define Prefix5 Prefix(Prefix4) ; 
define UnambigPrefix5 Prefix4 - Prefix5 ; 
define PrefixRule5 [UnambigPrefix5 .o. PrefixDict] TatarLetter* ; 
define Prefix6 Prefix(Prefix5) ; 
define UnambigPrefix6 Prefix5 - Prefix6 ; 
define PrefixRule6 [UnambigPrefix6 .o. PrefixDict] TatarLetter* ; 

define PrefixRule PrefixRule1 .P. PrefixRule2 .P. PrefixRule3 .P. PrefixRule4 .P. PrefixRule5 .P. PrefixRule6 ; 

define LatinVowelLetter a|e|i|o|u ; 
define LatinConsonantLetter b|v|w|g|ğ|d|j|c|z|y|k|q|l|m|n|p|r|s|t|f|x|h ; 
define LatinLetter LatinVowelLetter | LatinConsonantLetter ; 

define TatarWord WordDict .P. PrefixRule .P. [[TatarLetter|LatinLetter]+] ; 

define TatarConsonant b|v|g|d|zh|zhj|z|j|k|l|m|n|ng|p|r|s|t|f|hh|h|shj|sh|w ; 
define TatarVowel a|af|e|i|y|o|of|u|uf ; 

define TatarBasicConsonantTranscription б:b|в:w|[г|ғ]:g|д:d|[ж|j]:zh|җ:zhj|з:z|й:j|[к|қ]:k|л:l|м:m|н:n|ң:ng|п:p|р:r|с:s|т:t|ф:f|х:hh|һ:h|ц:c|ч:shj|ш:sh|щ:shj|ğ:gh|q:kh|w:w|x:{ks}|c:{ts} ; 
define TatarBasicConsonantsTranscription TatarBasicConsonantTranscription -> ; 

define TatarIntervocalicCTranscription c -> {ts} || TatarVowelLetter _ TatarVowelLetter ; 
define TatarDefaultCTranscription c -> s ; 

define TatarBasicVowelTranscription а:a|ә:af|е:je|ё:jo|[и|і]:i|о:o|ө:of|у:u|ү:uf|ы:y|э:e|ю:ju|я:ja|y:i ; 
define TatarBasicVowelsTranscription TatarBasicVowelTranscription -> ; 

define TatarIntervocalicWInsertion 
[..] -> w || u|uf _ TatarVowel ; 

define TatarJVowelAsFront [0:jj] [je:e|jo:of|ju:uf|ja:af] ; 

define TatarJVowelAsBack [0:jj] [je:y|jo:o|ju:u|ja:a] ; 

define TatarJVowelsAfterConsonants je:e|ju:uf|ja:af|jo:of -> || TatarConsonant _ ; 

define TatarFrontVowel af|e|i|of|uf ;

define TatarBackVowel a|o|u|y ; 

define TatarJVowelsBeforeSoftSignTranscription 
TatarJVowelAsFront -> || _ TatarConsonant* ь ; 

define TatarJVowelsForwardSearchTranscription 
TatarJVowelAsFront -> || _ [\TatarBackVowel]* TatarFrontVowel ,, 
TatarJVowelAsBack -> || _ [\TatarFrontVowel]* TatarBackVowel ; 

define TatarJVowelsBackwardSearchTranscription 
TatarJVowelAsFront -> || TatarFrontVowel [\TatarBackVowel]* _ ,, 
TatarJVowelAsBack -> || TatarBackVowel [\TatarFrontVowel]* _ ; 

define TatarJVowelSequenceTranscription 
TatarJVowelAsFront^>1 @-> ; 

define TatarJVowelsDefaultTranscription 
TatarJVowelAsBack -> ; 

define TatarUjeException 
jj -> w || uf _ e ; 

define TatarJBeforeJVowels 
jj -> j ; 

define TatarUvularStopsTranscription 
k:kh|g:gh -> || _ ъ|TatarBackVowel , TatarBackVowel _ TatarConsonant+ TatarBackVowel | .#. ; 

define TatarSoftAndHardSignsRemoval ь|ъ -> 0 || _ ; 

define TatarNonSyllabicUToW 
[u|uf] -> w || TatarVowel _ ; 

define TatarVInSurnameLeftContext ? ? ? [о|е] ; 

define TatarVInSurnamesOfWomen 
в -> v || TatarVInSurnameLeftContext _ (н) а [[н|г|д|л|м|ң|с]|.#.] ; 

define TatarVInSurnamesOfMen 
в -> v || TatarVInSurnameLeftContext _ [ы] | [{ич}] ,, 
в -> f || TatarVInSurnameLeftContext _ [[н|к|т|л] | .#.] ; 

define TatarTranscription 
TatarWord .o. 
TatarVInSurnamesOfWomen .o. 
TatarVInSurnamesOfMen .o. 
TatarBasicConsonantsTranscription .o. 
TatarIntervocalicCTranscription .o. 
TatarDefaultCTranscription .o. 
TatarBasicVowelsTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsAfterConsonants .o. 
TatarJVowelsBeforeSoftSignTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsForwardSearchTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsBackwardSearchTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelSequenceTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsDefaultTranscription .o. 
TatarUjeException .o. 
TatarIntervocalicWInsertion .o. 
TatarJBeforeJVowels .o. 
TatarUvularStopsTranscription .o. 
TatarNonSyllabicUToW .o. 
TatarSoftAndHardSignsRemoval ; 

define TatarBasicPromptConsonantTranscription  [в:v] .P. TatarBasicConsonantTranscription ; 
define TatarBasicPromptConsonantsTranscription TatarBasicPromptConsonantTranscription -> ; 

define TatarPromptTranscription 
[TatarLetter+] .o. 
TatarBasicPromptConsonantsTranscription .o. 
TatarIntervocalicCTranscription .o. 
TatarDefaultCTranscription .o. 
TatarBasicVowelsTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsAfterConsonants .o. 
TatarJVowelsBeforeSoftSignTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsForwardSearchTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsBackwardSearchTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelSequenceTranscription .o. 
TatarJVowelsDefaultTranscription .o. 
TatarUjeException .o. 
TatarIntervocalicWInsertion .o. 
TatarJBeforeJVowels .o. 
TatarUvularStopsTranscription .o. 
TatarNonSyllabicUToW .o. 
TatarSoftAndHardSignsRemoval ; 

regex TatarTranscription ; 
